src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_UHL_STEM_1_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - k̲áaguhl - ENGLISH : # CLASS_UHL_STEM_1

     k̲áaguhl+V+Sg+Impv: k̲áaguhl
     k̲áaguhl+V+Interr+Simp+Pres: k̲áaguhl
     k̲áaguhl+V+Rel: k̲áaguhls
     k̲áaguhl+V+Interr+Fut+Long: k̲áaguhläsaa
     k̲áaguhl+V+Interr+Fut+Short: k̲áaguhläs
     k̲áaguhl+V+Simp+Fut: k̲áaguhläsaang
     k̲áaguhl+V+Imm+Fut: k̲áaguhläsga
     k̲áaguhl+V+Rel+Fut: k̲áaguhläsaas
     k̲áaguhl+V+Fut+NonFact: k̲áaguhläsaa.ang
     k̲áaguhl+V+Bias+Imm+Pres: k̲áaguhlʼuuj
     k̲áaguhl+V+Bias+Simp+Pres: k̲áaguhlʼuujang
     k̲áaguhl+V+Res: k̲áaguhläsaaʼuujang
     k̲áaguhl+V+Bias+Interr+Pres: k̲áaguhlʼus
     k̲áaguhl+V+Bias+Interr+Past: k̲áaguhlʼujaa
     k̲áaguhl+V+Bias+Interr+Past+Hab: k̲áaguhlʼuujaangaa
     k̲áaguhl+V+Bias+Interr+Fut: k̲áaguhläsaaʼus
     k̲áaguhl+V+Cert+Fut: k̲áaguhläsaaʼahlans
     k̲áaguhl+V+Fut+Rflx+Interr: k̲áaguhläseehl
     k̲áaguhl+V+Pl+Impv: k̲áaguhlʼuu
     k̲áaguhl+V+3pl+Imm+Pres: k̲áaguhlʼwaa
     k̲áaguhl+V+3pl+Interr+Simp+Pres: k̲áaguhlʼwaa
     k̲áaguhl+V+3pl+Simp+Pres: k̲áaguhlʼwaang
     k̲áaguhl+V+3pl+Dir+Past: k̲áaguhlʼwägan
     k̲áaguhl+V+3pl+Interr+Past: k̲áaguhlʼaawaa
     k̲áaguhl+V+3pl+Indir+Past: k̲áaguhlʼaawaan
     k̲áaguhl+V+3pl+Rel: k̲áaguhlʼwaas
     k̲áaguhl+V+3pl+Rel+Evid: k̲áaguhlʼaawaas
     k̲áaguhl+V+3pl+NonFact: k̲áaguhlʼwaa.ang
     k̲áaguhl+V+3pl+Past+NonFact: k̲áaguhlʼaawaa.ang
     k̲áaguhl+V+3pl+Dir+Past+Hab: k̲áaguhlʼwägiinii
     k̲áaguhl+V+3pl+Interr+Past+Hab: k̲áaguhlʼwägaangaa
     k̲áaguhl+V+3pl+Indir+Past+Hab: k̲áaguhlʼwägaangaan
     k̲áaguhl+V+3pl+Interr+Fut+Long: k̲áaguhlʼwaaäsaa
     k̲áaguhl+V+3pl+Interr+Fut+Short: k̲áaguhlʼwaaäs
     k̲áaguhl+V+3pl+Simp+Fut: k̲áaguhlʼwaaäsaang
     k̲áaguhl+V+3pl+Imm+Fut: k̲áaguhlʼwaaäsga
     k̲áaguhl+V+3pl+Rel+Fut: k̲áaguhlʼwaaäsaas
     k̲áaguhl+V+3pl+Fut+NonFact: k̲áaguhlʼwaaäsaa.ang
     k̲áaguhl+V+3pl+Interr+Near+Fut: k̲áaguhlʼwaa.ang k̲asaʼáa
     k̲áaguhl+V+3pl+Near+Fut: k̲áaguhlʼwaa.ang k̲asaʼáang
     k̲áaguhl+V+3pl+Interr+VNear+Fut: k̲áaguhlʼwaa.ang k̲asaasdláa
     k̲áaguhl+V+3pl+VNear+Fut: k̲áaguhlʼwaa.ang k̲asaasdláang
     k̲áaguhl+V+3pl+Bias+Imm+Pres: k̲áaguhlʼwaaʼuuj
     k̲áaguhl+V+3pl+Bias+Simp+Pres: k̲áaguhlʼwaaʼuujang
     k̲áaguhl+V+3pl+Res: k̲áaguhlʼwaaäsaaʼuujang
     k̲áaguhl+V+3pl+Bias+Interr+Pres: k̲áaguhlʼwaaʼus
     k̲áaguhl+V+3pl+Bias+Interr+Past: k̲áaguhlʼwaaʼujaa
     k̲áaguhl+V+3pl+Bias+Interr+Past+Hab: k̲áaguhlʼwaaʼuujaangaa
     k̲áaguhl+V+3pl+Bias+Interr+Fut: k̲áaguhlʼwaaäsaaʼus
     k̲áaguhl+V+3pl+Cert+Pres: k̲áaguhlʼwaaʼahlanggang
     k̲áaguhl+V+3pl+Cert+Past: k̲áaguhlʼwaaʼahlanggan
     k̲áaguhl+V+3pl+Cert+Past+Hab: k̲áaguhlʼwaaʼahlanggiinii
     k̲áaguhl+V+3pl+Cert+Fut: k̲áaguhlʼwaaäsaaʼahlans
     k̲áaguhl+V+3pl+Cert+Rel: k̲áaguhlʼwaaʼahlans
     k̲áaguhl+V+3pl+Ints+Past: k̲áaguhlʼaawaaʼahlang
     k̲áaguhl+V+3pl+Cont: k̲áaguhlʼaawaaʼahlanggaa
     k̲áaguhl+V+3pl+Ctfact+Pres: k̲áaguhlʼaawaaʼahlanggang
     k̲áaguhl+V+3pl+Rflx: k̲áaguhlʼwaaʼahl
     k̲áaguhl+V+3pl+Fut+Rflx+Interr: k̲áaguhlʼwaaäseehl
     k̲áaguhl+V+Neg+Sg+Impv: k̲áaguhlʼang
     k̲áaguhl+V+Neg+Imm+Pres: k̲áaguhlʼangga
     k̲áaguhl+V+Neg+Interr+Simp+Pres: k̲áaguhlʼang
     k̲áaguhl+V+Neg+Simp+Pres: k̲áaguhlʼanggang
     k̲áaguhl+V+Neg+Dir+Past: k̲áaguhlʼanggan
     k̲áaguhl+V+Neg+Interr+Past: k̲áaguhlʼaangaa
     k̲áaguhl+V+Neg+Indir+Past: k̲áaguhlʼaangaan
     k̲áaguhl+V+Neg+Rel: k̲áaguhlʼans
     k̲áaguhl+V+Neg+Rel+Evid: k̲áaguhlʼaangaas
     k̲áaguhl+V+Neg+NonFact: k̲áaguhlʼangang
     k̲áaguhl+V+Neg+Past+NonFact: k̲áaguhlʼaangaa.ang
     k̲áaguhl+V+Neg+Interr+Pres+Hab: k̲áaguhlʼanggang
     k̲áaguhl+V+Neg+Dir+Past+Hab: k̲áaguhlʼanggiinii
     k̲áaguhl+V+Neg+Interr+Past+Hab: k̲áaguhlʼanggaangaa
     k̲áaguhl+V+Neg+Indir+Past+Hab: k̲áaguhlʼanggaangaan
     k̲áaguhl+V+Neg+Interr+Fut+Long: k̲áaguhlʼangäsaa
     k̲áaguhl+V+Neg+Interr+Fut+Short: k̲áaguhlʼangäs
     k̲áaguhl+V+Neg+Simp+Fut: k̲áaguhlʼangäsaang
     k̲áaguhl+V+Neg+Imm+Fut: k̲áaguhlʼangäsga
     k̲áaguhl+V+Neg+Rel+Fut: k̲áaguhlʼangäsaas
     k̲áaguhl+V+Neg+Fut+NonFact: k̲áaguhlʼangäsaa.ang
     k̲áaguhl+V+Neg+Bias+Imm+Pres: k̲áaguhlʼangʼuuj
     k̲áaguhl+V+Neg+Bias+Simp+Pres: k̲áaguhlʼangʼuujang
     k̲áaguhl+V+Neg+Res: k̲áaguhlʼangäsaaʼuujang
     k̲áaguhl+V+Neg+Bias+Interr+Pres: k̲áaguhlʼangʼus
     k̲áaguhl+V+Neg+Bias+Interr+Past: k̲áaguhlʼangʼujaa
     k̲áaguhl+V+Neg+Bias+Interr+Past+Hab: k̲áaguhlʼangʼuujaangaa
     k̲áaguhl+V+Neg+Bias+Interr+Fut: k̲áaguhlʼangäsaaʼus
     k̲áaguhl+V+Neg+Cert+Pres: k̲áaguhlʼaangʼahlanggang
     k̲áaguhl+V+Neg+Cert+Past: k̲áaguhlʼaangʼahlanggan
     k̲áaguhl+V+Neg+Cert+Past+Hab: k̲áaguhlʼaangʼahlanggiinii
     k̲áaguhl+V+Neg+Cert+Fut: k̲áaguhlʼangäsaaʼahlans
     k̲áaguhl+V+Neg+Cert+Rel: k̲áaguhlʼaangʼahlans
     k̲áaguhl+V+Neg+Ints+Past: k̲áaguhlʼaangaaʼahlang
     k̲áaguhl+V+Neg+Cont: k̲áaguhlʼaangaaʼahlanggaa
     k̲áaguhl+V+Neg+Ctfact+Pres: k̲áaguhlʼaangaaʼahlanggang
     k̲áaguhl+V+Neg+Rflx: k̲áaguhlʼaangʼahl
     k̲áaguhl+V+Neg+Fut+Rflx+Interr: k̲áaguhlʼangäseehl
     k̲áaguhl+V+Neg+Pl+Impv: k̲áaguhlʼangʼuu
     k̲áaguhl+V+Neg+3pl+Imm+Pres: k̲áaguhlʼangʼwaa
     k̲áaguhl+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Simp+Pres: k̲áaguhlʼangʼwaa
     k̲áaguhl+V+Neg+3pl+Simp+Pres: k̲áaguhlʼangʼwaang
     k̲áaguhl+V+Neg+3pl+Dir+Past: k̲áaguhlʼangʼwägan
     k̲áaguhl+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Past: k̲áaguhlʼangʼaawaa
     k̲áaguhl+V+Neg+3pl+Indir+Past: k̲áaguhlʼangʼaawaan
     k̲áaguhl+V+Neg+3pl+Rel: k̲áaguhlʼangʼwaas
     k̲áaguhl+V+Neg+3pl+Rel+Evid: k̲áaguhlʼangʼaawaas
     k̲áaguhl+V+Neg+3pl+NonFact: k̲áaguhlʼangʼwaa.ang
     k̲áaguhl+V+Neg+3pl+Past+NonFact: k̲áaguhlʼangʼaawaa.ang
     k̲áaguhl+V+Neg+3pl+Dir+Past+Hab: k̲áaguhlʼangʼwägiinii
     k̲áaguhl+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Past+Hab: k̲áaguhlʼangʼwägaangaa
     k̲áaguhl+V+Neg+3pl+Indir+Past+Hab: k̲áaguhlʼangʼwägaangaan
     k̲áaguhl+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Fut+Long: k̲áaguhlʼangʼwaaäsaa
     k̲áaguhl+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Fut+Short: k̲áaguhlʼangʼwaaäs
     k̲áaguhl+V+Neg+3pl+Simp+Fut: k̲áaguhlʼangʼwaaäsaang
     k̲áaguhl+V+Neg+3pl+Imm+Fut: k̲áaguhlʼangʼwaaäsga
     k̲áaguhl+V+Neg+3pl+Rel+Fut: k̲áaguhlʼangʼwaaäsaas
     k̲áaguhl+V+Neg+3pl+Fut+NonFact: k̲áaguhlʼangʼwaaäsaa.ang
     k̲áaguhl+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Near+Fut: k̲áaguhlʼwaa.ang k̲asaaʼáng
     k̲áaguhl+V+Neg+3pl+Near+Fut: k̲áaguhlʼwaa.ang k̲asaaʼánggang
     k̲áaguhl+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+VNear+Fut: k̲áaguhlʼwaa.ang k̲asaasdläʼáng
     k̲áaguhl+V+Neg+3pl+VNear+Fut: k̲áaguhlʼwaa.ang k̲asaasdläʼánggang
     k̲áaguhl+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Imm+Pres: k̲áaguhlʼangʼwaaʼuuj
     k̲áaguhl+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Simp+Pres: k̲áaguhlʼangʼwaaʼuujang
     k̲áaguhl+V+Neg+3pl+Res: k̲áaguhlʼangʼwaaäsaaʼuujang
     k̲áaguhl+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Interr+Pres: k̲áaguhlʼangʼwaaʼus
     k̲áaguhl+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Interr+Past: k̲áaguhlʼangʼwaaʼujaa
     k̲áaguhl+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Interr+Past+Hab: k̲áaguhlʼangʼwaaʼuujaangaa
     k̲áaguhl+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Interr+Fut: k̲áaguhlʼangʼwaaäsaaʼus
     k̲áaguhl+V+Neg+3pl+Cert+Pres: k̲áaguhlʼangʼwaaʼahlanggang
     k̲áaguhl+V+Neg+3pl+Cert+Past: k̲áaguhlʼangʼwaaʼahlanggan
     k̲áaguhl+V+Neg+3pl+Cert+Past+Hab: k̲áaguhlʼangʼwaaʼahlanggiinii
     k̲áaguhl+V+Neg+3pl+Cert+Fut: k̲áaguhlʼangʼwaaäsaaʼahlans
     k̲áaguhl+V+Neg+3pl+Cert+Rel: k̲áaguhlʼangʼwaaʼahlans
     k̲áaguhl+V+Neg+3pl+Ints+Past: k̲áaguhlʼangʼaawaaʼahlang
     k̲áaguhl+V+Neg+3pl+Cont: k̲áaguhlʼangʼaawaaʼahlanggaa
     k̲áaguhl+V+Neg+3pl+Ctfact+Pres: k̲áaguhlʼangʼaawaaʼahlanggang
     k̲áaguhl+V+Neg+3pl+Rflx: k̲áaguhlʼangʼwaaʼahl
     k̲áaguhl+V+Neg+3pl+Fut+Rflx+Interr: k̲áaguhlʼangʼwaaäseehl
